Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 3. Kidnapping, Custodial Interference, and Human Trafficking.

Collateral references. —

1 Am. Jur. 2d, Abduction and Kidnapping, § 1 et seq.

51 C.J.S., Kidnapping, § 1 et seq.

Fraud or false pretenses, kidnapping by, 95 ALR2d 450.

What is harm within provisions of statutes increasing penalty for kidnapping where victim suffers harm, 11 ALR3d 1053.

Necessity and sufficiency of showing, in kidnapping prosecution, that detention was with intent to “secretly” confine victim, 98 ALR3d 733.

Kidnapping or related offense by taking or removing of child by or under authority of parent or one in loco parentis, 20 ALR4th 823.

Liability of legal or natural parent, or one who aids and abets, for damages resulting from abduction of own child,
49 ALR4th 7.

Seizure or detention for purposes of committing rape, robbery, or similar offense as constituting separate crime of kidnapping, 39 ALR5th 283.

Validity, construction, and application of state statutes or ordinances regulating sexual performance by child,
42 ALR5th 291.

Sec. 11.41.300.
Kidnapping.

A person commits the crime of kidnapping if

the person restrains another with intent to

hold the restrained person for ransom, reward, or other payment;

use the restrained person as a shield or hostage;

inflict physical injury upon or sexually assault the restrained person or place the restrained person or a third person in apprehension that any person will be subjected to serious physical injury or sexual assault;

interfere with the performance of a governmental or political function;

facilitate the commission of a felony or flight after commission of a felony;

commit an offense in violation of AS

11.41.434

—

11.41.438

upon the restrained person or place the restrained person or a third person in apprehension that a person will be subject to an offense in violation of AS

11.41.434

—

11.41.438

; or

the person restrains another

by secreting and holding the restrained person in a place where the restrained person is not likely to be found; or

under circumstances which expose the restrained person to a substantial risk of serious physical injury.

In a prosecution under (a)(2)(A) of this section, it is an affirmative defense that

the defendant was a relative of the victim;

the victim was a child under 18 years of age or an incompetent person; and

the primary intent of the defendant was to assume custody of the victim.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, kidnapping is an unclassified felony and is punishable as provided in AS 12.55.

In a prosecution for kidnapping, it is an affirmative defense which reduces the crime to a class A felony that the defendant voluntarily caused the release of the victim alive in a safe place before arrest, or within 24 hours after arrest, without having caused serious physical injury to the victim and without having engaged in conduct described in AS

11.41.410(a)

,

11.41.420

,

11.41.434

, or

11.41.436

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 7 ch 102 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 4 SLA 1990; am §§ 3, 4 ch 99 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

Definition of “restrain,” “relative” - AS

11.41.370

Definition of “physical injury,” “serious physical injury,” “incompetent person,” “affirmative defense” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Assault in the first, second, third, and fourth degree - AS

11.41.200

—

11.41.230

Reckless endangerment - AS

11.41.250

Custodial interference in the first and second degree - AS

11.41.320

,

11.41.330

Sexual assault in the first and second degree - AS

11.41.410

,

11.41.420

Failure to permit visitation with a minor - AS

11.51.125

Term of imprisonment for kidnapping - AS

12.55.125(b)

Original Code Provision - AS 11.15.260

TD: I, 58-62.

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125(b)

for imprisonment for unclassified felonies, AS

12.55.125(c)

for imprisonment for class A felonies, and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Administrative Code. —

For eligibility for discretionary parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 1.

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 28, 1980.

Sec. 11.41.320.
Custodial interference in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of custodial interference in the first degree if the person violates AS

11.41.330(a)(1)

and causes the child or incompetent person to be

removed from the state; or

kept outside the state.

Custodial interference in the first degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 6 ch 54 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 83 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For applicability provisions relating to the 1999 amendment of subsection (a), see § 16, ch. 54, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 36(a), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsection (a) as amended by sec. 1, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to offenses occurring on or after July 17, 2014.

Sec. 11.41.330.
Custodial interference in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of custodial interference in the second degree if

being a relative of a child under 18 years of age or a relative of an incompetent person and knowing that the person has no legal right to do so, the person takes, entices, or keeps that child or incompetent person from a lawful custodian with intent to hold the child or incompetent person for a protracted period; or

not being a relative of a child under 18 years of age or a relative of an incompetent person, knowing that the person has no right to do so and with the intent to take or keep the child or incompetent person, the person represents to the lawful custodian that the person has a right to take or keep the child or incompetent person.

The affirmative defense of necessity under AS

11.81.320

does not apply to a prosecution for custodial interference under (a)(1) of this section if the protracted period for which the person held the child or incompetent person exceeded the shorter of the following:

24 hours; or

the time necessary to report to a peace officer or social service agency that the child or incompetent person has been abused, neglected, or is in imminent physical danger.

Custodial interference in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 69 SLA 2005; am §§ 2, 3 ch 83 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was enacted as subsection (c) and relettered in 2005, at which time former subsection (b) was relettered as (c).

Cross references. —

Definition of “lawful custodian,” “relative” -
AS

11.41.370

Definition of “incompetent person” -
AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally,” “knowingly” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Kidnapping -
AS

11.41.300

Failure to permit visitation with a minor -
AS

11.51.125(a)

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Editor’s notes. —

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 36(a), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsections (a) and (b) as amended by secs. 2 and 3, ch. 83, SLA 2014, apply to offenses occurring on or after July 17, 2014.

Sec. 11.41.360.
Human trafficking in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of human trafficking in the first degree if the person compels or induces another person to engage in sexual conduct, adult entertainment, or labor in the state by force or threat of force against any person, or by deception.

In this section,

“adult entertainment” means the conduct described in AS

23.10.350(f)(1)

— (3);

“deception” has the meaning given in AS

11.46.180

;

“sexual conduct” has the meaning given in AS

11.66.150

.

Human trafficking in the first degree is a class A felony.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 2006; am § 4 ch 1 TSSLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 11.41.310 and renumbered in 2006.

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A felonies, see AS

12.55.125(c)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For temporary law providing for task force on the crimes of human trafficking, promoting prostitution, and sex trafficking, established July 1, 2012, and repealed June 1, 2013, see §§ 18, 19, and 21, ch. 70, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 27(b), ch. 1, TSSLA 2012, provides that the 2012 amendments to (a) of this section apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2012.

Legislative history reports. —

For the governor's transmittal letter concerning
ch. 1, TSSLA 2012 (HB 359), see 2012 House Journal 1666 — 1668.

Sec. 11.41.365.
Human trafficking in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of human trafficking in the second degree if the person obtains a benefit from the commission of human trafficking under AS

11.41.360

, with reckless disregard that the benefit is a result of the trafficking.

Human trafficking in the second degree is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 11.41.315 and renumbered in 2006, at which time an internal reference in the text of the section was conformed.

Cross references. —

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For temporary law providing for task force on the crimes of human trafficking, promoting prostitution, and sex trafficking, established July 1, 2012, and repealed June 1, 2013, see §§ 18, 19, and 21, ch. 70, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 11.41.370.
Definitions.

In AS

11.41.300

—

11.41.370

, unless the context requires otherwise,

“lawful custodian” means a parent, guardian, or other person responsible by authority of law for the care, custody, or control of another;

“relative” means a parent, stepparent, ancestor, descendant, sibling, uncle, or aunt, including a relative of the same degree through marriage or adoption;

“restrain” means to restrict a person’s movements unlawfully and without consent, so as to interfere substantially with the person’s liberty by moving the person from one place to another or by confining the person either in the place where the restriction commences or in a place to which the person has been moved; a restraint is “without consent” if it is accomplished

by acquiescence of the restrained person, if the restrained person is under 16 years of age or is incompetent and the restrained person’s lawful custodian has not acquiesced in the movement or confinement; or

by force, threat, or deception.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

For definitions of terms used in this title, see AS

11.81.900

.